Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO HOSPITAL AUTHORITY

23-21-501. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The mission of the university of Colorado university hospital is to facilitate and support the education, research, and public service activities of the health sciences schools operated by the regents of the university of Colorado and to provide patient care, including care for the medically indigent, and specialized services not widely available elsewhere in the state and region;

In order to provide for the education and training of health-care professionals, to provide a clinical setting for biomedical research, to ensure the availability of quality patient care including specialized medical services not otherwise widely available, and to provide for the care and treatment of the medically indigent, it is necessary that the university of Colorado university hospital be a facility of the finest possible quality;

The present university of Colorado university hospital is unable to become and remain economically viable due to constraints imposed by being subject to various kinds of government policy and regulation;

Unless the university of Colorado university hospital can become and remain economically viable, it will become ever more dependent upon state subsidies, and the quality of medical service and education will inevitably decline;

The needs of the citizens of the state of Colorado and of the university of Colorado health sciences schools will be best served if the university of Colorado university hospital is operated by a quasi-governmental and corporate entity charged with the mission of operating a teaching hospital for the benefit of the health sciences schools and providing care for the medically indigent;

Subject to the provisions of section 25.5-3-102 (2), C.R.S., the authority to be created pursuant to this part 5 to operate the university of Colorado university hospital by receiving its assets and operating obligations shall continue to subsidize the costs of delivering medically indigent care in excess of the state reimbursement for the medically indigent. Consistent with the university of Colorado university hospital's past policy and performance, the authority will make every reasonable effort to continue the hospital's historic commitment to the provision of uncompensated care and shall allocate and invest its resources with a view to maximizing the hospital's long-term ability to provide uncompensated care.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 556, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(f) amended, p. 2006, § 66, effective July 1.

23-21-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5 and part 6 of this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means the political subdivision and body corporate called the university of Colorado hospital authority created by this part 5.

"Board of directors" means the board of directors of the authority.

"Health sciences schools" means the schools of medicine, dentistry, nursing, pharmacy, and any other schools operated by the regents of the university of Colorado at the university health sciences center.

"Hospital assets" means all property or rights in property, real and personal, tangible and intangible existing on the transfer date under this part 5, used by or accruing to university hospital in the normal course of its operations as a teaching, research, and medical treatment facility.

"Hospital liabilities" means all debts or other obligations, contingent or certain, owing on the transfer date under this part 5 to any person or other entity arising out of the operation of university hospital as a medical treatment facility, and including, without limitation, all debts for the purchase of goods and services, whether or not delivered, and obligations for the delivery of services, whether or not performed.

"Part 4 corporation" means the nonprofit-nonstock corporation created on July 24, 1989, to operate university hospital.

"PERA" means the public employees' retirement association created in part 2 of article 51 of title 24, C.R.S.

"Regents" means the board of regents of the university of Colorado.

"State employee" means a person employed by the state whether or not a classified employee in the state personnel system.

"Transfer date under this part 5" or "authority's transfer date" means a date agreed to by the regents and the authority for the transfer of hospital assets to and the assumption of hospital liabilities by such authority.

"University hospital" means the hospital and clinics created and operated by the regents of the university of Colorado under section 5 of article VIII of the Colorado constitution.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 557, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-503. University of Colorado hospital authority.

There is hereby created the university of Colorado hospital authority, which shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, which shall not be an agency of state government, and which shall not be subject to administrative direction or control by the regents or by any department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors who shall be appointed by the regents. The board of directors shall control the day-to-day operation of university hospital.

The board consists of the following members:

One director appointed from each congressional district; and

Three directors appointed from the state at large.

Of all the directors appointed to the board, one director must reside west of the continental divide, and not more than one-third of the directors shall be employees of the university of Colorado or of the authority.

The appointment of the directors from the congressional districts is subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The term of office for appointed members is four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of members' terms expire in the same year.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to limit the power of the regents to appoint persons as directors of the authority who are directors of the part 4 corporation. Each director appointed from a congressional district, whether appointed for an unexpired term or a full term, shall be deemed duly appointed and qualified until the appointment of the director is approved or rejected by the senate. If the general assembly is not in regular session at the time the appointment is made or is in regular session but does not consider the appointment before adjourning, the appointment shall be submitted to the senate for its approval or rejection during the next regular session of the general assembly following the appointment.

Each member of the board of directors shall hold office for such member's term and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Any member shall be eligible for reappointment, but members shall not be eligible to serve more than two consecutive full terms. Members of the board shall receive no compensation for such services but shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as a member of the board. Any vacancy shall be filled by the regents.

Any member of the board of directors may be removed by the regents for malfeasance in office, failure to regularly attend meetings, or for any cause which renders said member incapable of or unfit to discharge the duties of director.

No part of the revenues or assets of the authority shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributed to, its board of directors or officers or any other private person or entity; except that the authority may make reasonable payments for expenses incurred on its behalf relating to any of its lawful purposes and the authority shall be authorized and empowered to pay reasonable compensation for services rendered to or for its benefit relating to any of its lawful purposes.

The authority and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; except that no such law shall take effect so long as the authority has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment thereof.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 558, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 28, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 33, § 42, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the provisions that designate the university of Colorado hospital authority as a "special purpose authority" for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, see § 24-77-102 (15).

23-21-504. Mission of the authority - obligation to provide uncompensated care - action of the board of directors.

The mission of the authority shall be the operation of university hospital as a state of the art teaching and research hospital providing comprehensive medical care, including tertiary care, and patient care of limited availability. The authority shall also provide space and facilities as necessary for the operation of the clinical programs of the health sciences schools at the health sciences center together with the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital, and, subject to the provisions of section 25.5-3-102 (2), C.R.S., the provision of medical care to those eligible for payment assistance through any program for the benefit of the medically indigent. For every three dollars of moneys appropriated by the general assembly that is distributed to the authority for the state medically indigent program, the authority shall provide four dollars worth of medically indigent care.

The board of directors shall award hospital privileges only to health-care providers who are faculty members of the health sciences schools of the university of Colorado.

The board of directors shall not transfer the authority's assets or the hospital's assets to any person or entity except the regents.

Upon the dissolution of the authority, all assets of the authority, after the satisfaction of creditors, shall revert to the regents.

The business activities of the authority, including any joint ventures, shall be primarily in furtherance or in support of the mission of the hospital as the same is specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 560, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 2006, § 67, effective July 1.

23-21-505. Authorization for transfer of hospital assets and liabilities to authority.

Following the creation of the authority and on the transfer date under this part 5, the regents shall have the authority to lease, convey, or otherwise transfer to the authority some or all hospital assets, except land which may be leased to the authority for a term not to exceed ninety-nine years. Any such lease, conveyance, or transfer shall be on such terms as may be approved by the regents and in consideration of the authority's agreement to assume the hospital liabilities and to continue to support the education, research, patient care, care to the medically indigent, and public service activities of the university of Colorado.

Any transfer of hospital assets to the authority pursuant to this section shall be conditioned upon the existence of a binding agreement between the regents and the authority which provides that, effective on the transfer date under this part 5 and thereafter, the authority shall assume responsibility for and shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the regents and the state and the part 4 corporation and its officers and directors with respect to:

All liabilities and duties of the regents pursuant to contracts, agreements, and leases for commodities, services, and supplies utilized by university hospital, including real property leases;

All claims related to the employment relationship between employees of the authority and the authority on and after the transfer date under this part 5;

All claims for breach of contract resulting from the authority's action or failure to act on and after the transfer date under this part 5;

All claims related to the authority's errors and omissions including, but not limited to: Medical malpractice; directors and officers liability; workers' compensation; automobile liability; and premises, completed operations, and products liability; and

All claims related to the part 4 corporation's errors and omissions prior to the transfer date under this part 5, including, but not limited to: Medical malpractice; directors and officers liability; workers' compensation; automobile liability; and premises, completed operations, and products liability.

Any transfer of hospital assets to the authority shall be further conditioned upon the existence of a binding agreement between the regents and the authority by which the authority shall accept and agree to abide by the provisions set forth in section 23-21-504 concerning the mission of the authority, the provisions in sections 23-21-507 and 23-21-508, and the provisions of part 6 of this article concerning employees of university hospital, the part 4 corporation, and the authority.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 560, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-506. Relationship between authority and regents.

Following the creation of the authority and on the transfer date under this part 5, and except for the power of the regents to appoint members of the board of directors, the regents shall have no further control over the operation of university hospital but shall be authorized to:

At such future date as the regents shall determine it to be necessary and for the purpose of preserving the certification of the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital and eligibility for federal funds thereunder, transfer some or all of the assets of the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital to the authority operating university hospital pursuant to the provisions of this article; except that the director of the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital shall at all times be a professor of psychiatry in the school of medicine of the university of Colorado. The transfer of assets of the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital shall be conditional upon the provision of retirement benefits and the protection of accrued sick leave and annual leave under sections 23-21-507 and 23-21-508 for state employees of the psychiatric hospital who become employees of the authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 through 112 of title 24, C.R.S., enter into contracts with the authority for the provision of goods, services, and facilities in support of programs of the university of Colorado; except that moneys paid to either the regents or the authority under said contracts shall not exceed a reasonable estimate of actual cost of the goods, services, or facilities.

In the regents' discretion, provide the authority and its employees with medical malpractice liability coverage from any self-insurance trust fund established pursuant to section 24-10-115, C.R.S., or any other provision of state law, or through such other fund or mechanism which may be available for the provision of such coverage by the regents to university of Colorado employees, at such cost as would be actuarially sound.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 561, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-507. Personnel.

Any employee of university hospital who is a state employee on the transfer date under this part 5 may elect to remain a state employee or become an employee of the authority. Said employee may elect to become an employee of the authority at any time but shall not thereafter return to state employment status while employed by the authority. No state employee shall be discriminated against in training, promotion, retention, assignment of duties, granting of rights and benefits, or any other personnel action. Promotion or a change in position shall not be contingent upon the employee becoming an employee of the authority.

Any employee who elects to remain a state employee shall retain all rights and privileges of the state employment status which is applicable to such employee's position.

In the case of any dispute involving an employee who is a member of the state personnel system, university hospital and the authority shall agree to accept resolution of all disciplinary appeals or other employment disputes governed by the statutes of the state personnel system or the rules of the state personnel department according to the rules and procedures applicable to members of the state personnel system.

Any employee who elects to become an employee of the authority shall receive full credit for sick leave and annual leave accrued while employed by university hospital.

Any employee initially employed by the authority operating university hospital pursuant to this part 5 on or after the transfer date under this part 5 shall be deemed to be an employee of the authority created under this part 5 and not a state employee.

The authority is authorized to contract with the university of Colorado health sciences center through the state personnel board pursuant to section 13 (4) of article XII of the state constitution for personnel.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 562, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-508. Retirement benefits - rights of former state employees - PERA membership.

Any employee initially employed by the authority on and after the transfer date under this part 5 shall be eligible for membership in the authority's qualified retirement plan.

Any employee of university hospital who was a member of PERA on the transfer date under this part 5 and who elects to become an employee of the authority pursuant to section 23-21-507 (1) shall have such employee's active membership in PERA terminated and shall be provided retirement benefits in accordance with this subsection (2).

Any employee of university hospital who elects to become an employee of the authority, and who has less than five years of service credit at the time such employee's active membership in PERA was terminated, may elect to have such employee's member contributions to PERA credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan. Any employee who so elects shall receive from the authority, upon retirement, a benefit which, when combined with social security, is at least equal to the benefit such employee would have received from PERA if such employee had continued to earn PERA service credit until retirement or the date upon which the employee ceases to be an employee of the authority. The calculation of such benefit shall be based upon the PERA benefit plan in effect on the transfer date under this part 5. Any employee who elects not to have such employee's member contributions credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan shall be entitled only to those retirement benefits provided in accordance with such plan.

Any employee of university hospital who elects to become an employee of the authority, and who has five or more years of service credit at the time such employee's active membership in PERA was terminated, may elect either to become a vested inactive member of PERA or to have such employee's member contributions to PERA credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan.

Any employee who becomes a vested inactive member of PERA shall receive from the authority, upon retirement, a benefit which, when combined with social security and the PERA retirement benefit earned by the employee, is at least equal to the benefit such employee would have received from PERA had such employee continued to earn PERA service credit until retirement or the date upon which the employee ceases to be an employee of the authority. The calculation of such benefit shall be based upon the PERA benefit plan in effect on the transfer date under this part 5.

Any employee who elects to have all member contributions credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan shall receive from the authority, upon retirement, a benefit which, when combined with social security, is at least equal to the benefit such employee would have received from PERA if such employee had continued to earn PERA service credit until retirement or the date upon which the employee ceases to be an employee of the authority. The calculation of such benefit shall be based upon the PERA benefit plan in effect on the transfer date under this part 5.

The discretion granted to an employee of the corporation by this subsection (2) to elect either vested inactive status in PERA or the crediting of the employee's member contributions to the authority's qualified retirement plan shall not be limited or abridged as a condition of employment or promotion by the authority.

An employee of university hospital who becomes an employee of the authority and whose member contributions in PERA are credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan shall be eligible to purchase service credit for previous employment at university hospital only pursuant to the terms of section 24-51-505, C.R.S.

As soon as practicable after the transfer date under this part 5, and again on each annual anniversary of such transfer date, the board of trustees of PERA shall determine the amount of reserves required to provide benefits and health care to former employees of university hospital who are benefit recipients or vested inactive members of PERA as provided in article 51 of title 24, C.R.S. The amount of reserves required shall be determined by the board of trustees utilizing certified actuarial reports prepared by the board's actuary.

If the amount of reserves on deposit in the state division trust fund of PERA to provide such benefits and health care, as calculated by the actuary, exceeds the amount of reserves required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), then the excess amount shall be paid to a retirement trust established by the authority as further provided in this subsection (3). Such payment shall be made if the actuarial report certifies that the payment will not have an adverse impact on the actuarial soundness of the state division trust fund or the PERA health care trust fund. If the actuary determines, in accordance with accepted actuarial principles, that the payment provided by this paragraph (b) will have an adverse impact on the actuarial soundness of these funds, the payment shall not be permitted.

Not later than one hundred twenty days following the transfer date under this part 5, and again not later than one hundred twenty days following each anniversary date of such transfer date, the board of trustees of PERA shall pay to a retirement trust established by the authority any moneys payable pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) together with all member contributions, not previously paid, of all employees electing to have their member contributions credited to the authority's qualified retirement plan pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. PERA shall include interest on such payment for the period from the transfer date under this part 5, or subsequent anniversary of such transfer date, to the date of payment at the rate specified for members in section 24-51-101 (28), C.R.S.

All expenses incurred by the board of trustees of PERA for the preparation of actuarial reports pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) shall be paid by the authority. Such expenses shall be deducted from any amounts transferred pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (3). Any actuarial reports prepared pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be made available to the authority upon request.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 563, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 93:

(3)(b) amended, p. 481, § 14, effective March 1, 1994.

L. 97:

(3)(b) amended, p. 778, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1938, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.

23-21-509. Status of part 4 corporation - effect of actions taken by part 4 corporation - validation of certain actions.

It is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section to address the status of the part 4 corporation, and actions taken by such corporation on and after October 1, 1989, as said status and actions relate to the operation of university hospital by the authority. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any litigation concerning the part 4 corporation.

The hospital assets and hospital liabilities which existed on September 30, 1989, and which were transferred by the regents to the part 4 corporation on October 1, 1989, shall be transferred to the authority in accordance with the provisions of this part 5.

Any indebtedness or other obligations incurred by the part 4 corporation between October 1, 1989, and the transfer date under this part 5 shall be assumed by the authority on such transfer date.

Any assets acquired by the part 4 corporation between October 1, 1989, and the transfer date under this part 5 may be transferred to the authority on such transfer date.

Any contract, lease, license agreement, credit agreement, or similar business transaction entered into by the part 4 corporation between October 1, 1989, and the transfer date under this part 5 may be ratified by the authority on or after said transfer date. The ratification of any such transaction shall be in the sole discretion of the authority.

The employees of the part 4 corporation shall be subject to the provisions of part 6 of this article with respect to the employment status and pension status of such employees.

The transfer of moneys from PERA to a qualified retirement plan provided by the part 4 corporation on or after October 1, 1989, is declared to be a valid transfer. The status of the part 4 corporation's qualified retirement plan shall be as provided in section 23-21-604.

The part 4 corporation shall cooperate with the authority in accomplishing the purposes of this section and the remaining provisions of this part 5 and in accomplishing the purposes of part 6 of this article.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 566, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-510. Records of board of directors.

All resolutions and orders shall be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the secretary or any assistant secretary of the board of directors. Every legislative act of the board of directors of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions, orders, other proceedings of the board of directors, minutes of the meetings, annual reports and monthly financial statements, certificates, contracts and any financial agreements, and bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the authority, and any personnel reports, guidelines, manuals, handbooks, other than individual personnel files shall be a public record as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), C.R.S., and subject to the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The account of all moneys received by and disbursed on behalf of the authority shall also be a public record. All records shall be subject to the uniform budget and audit laws and shall be subject to regular audit as provided therein; except that the audit of the authority shall be on a fiscal year that begins on July 1 and ends on June 30. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, all writings and other records concerning the modification, initiation, or cessation of patient care programs shall not be deemed to be a public record and shall not be subject to the provisions of this section if premature disclosure of information contained in such writings or other records would give an unfair competitive or bargaining advantage to any person or entity.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 567, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-511. Meetings of board of directors.

All meetings of the board of directors shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-6-402, C.R.S. No business of the board of directors shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present. Any action of the board of directors shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the board.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 567, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-512. Disclosure of interests required.

Any member of the board of directors and any employee or other agent or adviser of the authority, who has a direct or indirect interest in any contract or transaction with the authority, shall disclose this interest to the authority. This interest shall be set forth in the minutes of the authority, and no director, employee, or other agent or adviser having such interest shall participate on behalf of the authority in the authorization of any such contract or transaction; except that the provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit any employee of the university of Colorado who is a member of the board of directors, who has no personal interest, from voting on the authorization of any such contract or transaction between the authority and the regents.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 567, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-513. General powers of the authority.

In addition to any other powers granted to the authority in this part 5, the authority shall have the following powers:

To have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a body corporate and political subdivision of the state;

To have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a seal and to alter the same at its pleasure;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into any contract or agreement not inconsistent with this part 5 or the laws of this state and to authorize the executive director to enter into contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this part 5 and to secure the payment of bonds;

To borrow money and to issue bonds evidencing the same;

To purchase, lease, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire, maintain, hold, improve, mortgage, lease, sell, and dispose of personal property, whether tangible or intangible, and any interest therein; and to purchase, lease, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire real property or any interest therein and to maintain, hold, improve, mortgage, lease, and otherwise transfer such real property, so long as such transactions do not interfere with the mission of the authority as specified in section 23-21-504;

To acquire space, equipment, services, supplies, and insurance necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 5;

To deposit any moneys of the authority in any banking institution within or without the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for the purpose of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the authority, who shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board of directors requires;

To contract for and to accept any gifts, grants, and loans of funds, property, or any other aid in any form from the federal government, the state, any state agency, or any other source, or any combination thereof, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this part 5, with the terms and conditions thereof;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 5, which specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 5;

To fix the time and place or places at which its regular and special meetings are to be held. Meetings shall be held on the call of the presiding officer, but no less than eight meetings shall be held annually.

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal bylaws and rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this part 5; except that article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not apply to the promulgation of any policies, procedures, rules, or regulations of the authority;

To appoint one or more persons as secretary and treasurer of the board and such other officers as the board of directors may determine and provide for their duties and terms of office; except that the president of the university of Colorado shall designate the director who shall be the presiding officer of the board of directors;

To appoint an executive director and such agents, employees, and professional and business advisers as may from time to time be necessary in its judgment to accomplish the purposes of this part 5, to fix the compensation of such executive director, employees, agents, and advisers, and to establish the powers and duties of all such agents, employees, and other persons contracting with the authority;

To waive, by such means as the authority deems appropriate, the exemption from federal income taxation of interest on the authority's bonds, notes, or other obligations provided by the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or any other federal statute providing a similar exemption;

To make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority under this part 5, including but not limited to contracts with any person, firm, corporation, municipality, state agency, county, or other entity. All municipalities, counties, and state agencies are hereby authorized to enter into and do all things necessary to perform any such arrangement or contract with the authority.

To arrange for guaranties or insurance of its bonds, notes, or other obligations by the federal government or by any private insurer, and to pay any premiums therefor.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 568, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(n) amended, (HB 11-1164), ch. 116, p. 363, § 1, effective April 20.